Hawaii statutes.
§342L-35 Response to suspected or confirmed
releases. The department, pursuant to chapter 91, shall adopt requirements
for investigating a suspected release and taking action in response to a
confirmed release from an underground storage tank or tank system, which shall
include at least the following:

(1) Requirement that when a release is found, the
substances in the tank or tank system be emptied if emptying the substances
does not present a greater danger to human health or the environment;

(2) Requirement for proper closure of the tank or
tank system, following the requirements established under section 342L-37, or
repair and testing of the tank or tank system before placing it back into
operation;

(3) Requirement that the owner and operator of the
underground storage tank or tank system that had a release restore the
environment to a condition and quality acceptable to the department; and

(4) Requirement to notify those members of the public
directly affected by the release and the proposed response to the release. [L
1989, c 212, pt of §6; am L 1992, c 259, §25]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next